District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.06

Training.

The Mayor shall provide for the establishment and supervision of programs, as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of this subchapter, for the education and training of employees in the recognition, avoidance, and prevention of unsafe and unhealthful working conditions and practices.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2006, 25 DCR 5740

History

1981 Ed., § 1-621.6.
1973 Ed., § 1-350.6.

Prior Codifications